test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-munoTS_gt-norm.yaml
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдаць, муӈгюдаць]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдонзь, муӈгюдонзь]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунон
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунод
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунода
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунониʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунонаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунодаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунодоʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунонась
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодась
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодась
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунонинзь
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодинзь
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодинзь
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунонаць
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодаць
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунодонзь
     муʼ+N+Tra: муӈэ
     муʼ+N+Car: мунзиˮ
     муʼ+N+Equ: мундремʼ
     муʼ+N+Equ+Lat: мундревʼ
